Texas statutes.
CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

TITLE 2. CODE OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE

CHAPTER 101. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Art. 101.001. PURPOSE OF TITLE. (a) This title is enacted as a part of the state's continuing statutory revision program, begun by the Texas Legislative Council in 1963 as directed by the legislature in Chapter 448, Acts of the 58th Legislature, Regular Session, 1963 (Article 5429b-1, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes). The program contemplates a topic-by-topic revision of the state's general and permanent statute law without substantive change.

(b) Consistent with the objectives of the statutory revision program, the purpose of this title is to make the law encompassed by this title more accessible and understandable by:

(1) rearranging the statutes into a more logical order;

(2) employing a format and numbering system designed to facilitate citation of the law and to accommodate future expansion of the law;

(3) eliminating repealed, duplicative, unconstitutional, expired, executed, and other ineffective provisions; and

(4) restating the law in modern American English to the greatest extent possible.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Art. 101.002. CONSTRUCTION OF TITLE. The Code Construction Act (Article 5429b-2, Vernon's Texas Civil Statutes) applies to the construction of each provision in this title, except as otherwise expressly provided by this title.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Art. 101.003. INTERNAL REFERENCES. In this title:

(1) a reference to a chapter or article without further identification is a reference to a chapter or article of this title; and

(2) a reference to a subchapter, article, subsection, subdivision, paragraph, or other numbered or lettered unit without further identification is a reference to a unit of the next larger unit of this title in which the reference appears.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Art. 101.004. MEANING OF CONVICTION. In this title, a person is considered to have been convicted in a case if:

(1) a judgment, a sentence, or both a judgment and a sentence are imposed on the person;

(2) the person receives community supervision, deferred adjudication, or deferred disposition; or

(3) the court defers final disposition of the case or imposition of the judgment and sentence.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 919 (S.B. 1923), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.